Wisconsin, session 2025, AB551.
do enact as follows:AB551,13Section 1. 20.370 (1) (mu) of the statutes is amended to read:AB551,2,10120.370 (1) (mu) General program operations — state funds. The amounts in 2the schedule for general program operations that are conducted under ss. 23.09 to 323.11, 27.01, 30.203, 30.277, and 90.21, and chs. 29 and 169, for activities conducted 4under the ecological inventory and monitoring program of the endangered 5resources program, for the aquatic and terrestrial resources inventory under s. 623.09 (2) (km), for providing the signage required under s. 23.118, for the chronic 7wasting disease sampling station program under s. 29.063 (7), and for payments of 8$53,700 in each fiscal year, to be credited to the appropriation account under s. 920.285 (1) (k), to the University of Wisconsin System for outdoor skills training 10under s. 29.598.AB551,211Section 2. 29.063 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB551,2,171229.063 (7) The department shall establish and administer a program under 13which it provides, at locations determined by the department, chronic wasting 14disease sampling stations, including self-service kiosks, where hunters may drop off 15deer carcass parts for chronic wasting disease sampling. The department may 16contract with private entities to conduct the sampling and may pay private entities 17per sample taken.AB551,318Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB551,3,319(1) Chronic wasting disease sampling stations. In the schedule under s. 2020.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of natural resources under s. 2120.370 (1) (mu), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $500,000 22for the chronic wasting disease sampling station program under s. 29.063 (7). In 23the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of natural 1resources under s. 20.370 (1) (mu), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 2increased by $500,000 for the chronic wasting disease sampling station program 3under s. 29.063 (7).AB551,3,44